Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.015

Affirmative action.

For the purposes of this chapter, "affirmative action" means a procedure by which racial minorities, women, persons in the protected age category, persons with disabilities, Vietnam-era veterans, and disabled veterans are provided with increased employment opportunities. It shall not mean any sort of quota system.

[ 1985 c 365 s 4; (2019 c 160 s 4, Referendum Measure No. 88 failed to become law).]